Washington statutes.
RCW 2.56.220

Family and juvenile court improvement grant program—Creation—Purpose.

Subject to the availability of funds appropriated therefor, the family and juvenile court improvement grant program is created.

(1) The purpose of the program is to assist superior courts in improving their family and juvenile court systems, especially in dependency cases, with the goals of:

(a) Assuring a stable and well-trained judiciary in family and juvenile law providing consistency of judicial officers hearing all of the proceedings in a case involving one family, especially in dependency cases; and

(b) Ensuring judicial accountability in implementing specific principles and practices for family and juvenile court.

(2) The administrator for the courts shall develop and administer the program subject to requirements in RCW 2.56.230. As part of administering the program, the administrator for the courts shall define appropriate outcome measures, collect data, and gather information from courts receiving grants.

[ 2008 c 279 s 1.]